Illinois, session 104th, SB1249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-104 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-104)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-104)7    Sec. 6-104. Classification of Driver - Special 8Restrictions. 9    (a) A driver's license issued under the authority of this 10Act shall indicate the classification for which the applicant 11therefor has qualified by examination or by such other means 12that the Secretary of State shall prescribe. Driver's license 13classifications shall be prescribed by rule or regulation 14promulgated by the Secretary of State and such may specify 15classifications as to operation of motor vehicles of the first 16division, or of those of the second division, whether operated 17singly or in lawful combination, and whether for-hire or 18not-for-hire, and may specify such other classifications as 19the Secretary deems necessary. 20    No person shall operate a motor vehicle unless such person 21has a valid license with a proper classification to permit the 22operation of such vehicle, except that any person may operate 23a moped if such person has a valid current Illinois driver's   SB1249 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03602 LNS 13626 b1license, regardless of classification. 2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or any 3rule adopted under this Code, a nonresident who is employed as 4a public safety worker, as defined in Section 6-117.2, may 5operate in this State an authorized emergency vehicle, as 6defined in Section 1-105, if the nonresident possesses the 7license class required by the nonresident's state of residence 8to operate similar equipment.9    (b) No person who is under the age of 21 years or has had 10less than 1 year of driving experience shall drive: (1) in 11connection with the operation of any school, day camp, summer 12camp, or nursery school, any public or private motor vehicle 13for transporting children to or from any school, day camp, 14summer camp, or nursery school, or (2) any motor vehicle of the 15second division when in use for the transportation of persons 16for compensation. 17    (c) No person who is under the age of 18 years shall be 18issued a license for the purpose of transporting property for 19hire, or for the purpose of transporting persons for 20compensation in a motor vehicle of the first division. 21    (d) No person shall drive: (1) a school bus when 22transporting school children unless such person possesses a 23valid school bus driver permit or is accompanied and 24supervised, for the specific purpose of training prior to 25routine operation of a school bus, by a person who has held a 26valid school bus driver permit for at least one year; or (2)   SB1249 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03602 LNS 13626 b1any other vehicle owned or operated by or for a public or 2private school, or a school operated by a religious 3institution, where such vehicle is being used over a regularly 4scheduled route for the transportation of persons enrolled as 5a student in grade 12 or below, in connection with any activity 6of the entities unless such person possesses a valid school 7bus driver permit. 8    (d-5) No person may drive a bus that does not meet the 9special requirements for school buses provided in Sections 1012-801, 12-802, 12-803, and 12-805 of this Code that has been 11chartered for the sole purpose of transporting students 12regularly enrolled in grade 12 or below to or from 13interscholastic athletic or interscholastic or school 14sponsored activities unless the person has a valid and 15properly classified commercial driver's license as provided in 16subsection (c-1) of Section 6-508 of this Code in addition to 17any other permit or license that is required to operate that 18bus. This subsection (d-5) does not apply to any bus driver 19employed by a public transportation provider authorized to 20conduct local or interurban transportation of passengers when 21the bus is not traveling a specific school bus route but is on 22a regularly scheduled route for the transporting of other fare 23paying passengers. 24    A person may operate a chartered bus described in this 25subsection (d-5) if he or she is not disqualified from driving 26a chartered bus of that type and if he or she holds a CDL that   SB1249 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03602 LNS 13626 b1is: 2        (1) issued to him or her by any other state or 3    jurisdiction in accordance with 49 CFR 383;4        (2) not suspended, revoked, or canceled; and5        (3) valid under 49 CFR 383, subpart F, for the type of 6    vehicle being driven. 7    A person may also operate a chartered bus described in 8this subsection (d-5) if he or she holds a valid CDL and a 9valid school bus driver permit that was issued on or before 10December 31, 2003. 11    (e) No person shall drive a religious organization bus 12unless such person has a valid and properly classified drivers 13license or a valid school bus driver permit. 14    (f) No person shall drive a motor vehicle for the purpose 15of providing transportation for the elderly in connection with 16the activities of any public or private organization unless 17such person has a valid and properly classified driver's 18license issued by the Secretary of State. 19    (g) No person shall drive a bus which meets the special 20requirements for school buses provided in Section 12-801, 2112-802, 12-803 and 12-805 of this Code for the purpose of 22transporting persons 18 years of age or less in connection 23with any youth camp licensed under the Youth Camp Act or any 24child care facility licensed under the Child Care Act of 1969 25unless such person possesses a valid school bus driver permit 26or is accompanied and supervised, for the specific purpose of   SB1249 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03602 LNS 13626 b1training prior to routine operation of a school bus, by a 2person who has held a valid school bus driver permit for at 3least one year; however, a person who has a valid and properly 4classified driver's license issued by the Secretary of State 5may operate a school bus for the purpose of transporting 6persons 18 years of age or less in connection with any such 7youth camp or child care facility if the "SCHOOL BUS" signs are 8covered or concealed and the stop signal arm and flashing 9signal systems are not operable through normal controls. 10    (h) No person shall operate an autocycle unless he or she 11has a valid Class D driver's license. 12(Source: P.A. 98-777, eff. 1-1-15.)